rm/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/rm.dic
Arnold/O
Formazzaisas/T
Hermann/O
Pitasch/T
Uranus/OT
abandunain/OPT
abiliteschian/OPT
abitual/OT
absentass/OPT
absorbziuns/OT
abusar/OPT
accentuava/OPTQ
acclamads/OPT
accumodaments/OT
accumpagnais/OPT
accumpleschia/OPT
accumulava/OPTQ
accusassas/OPT
acidifitgavas/OPT
activeschias/OPT
actualisais/OPT
adgiuditgadas/OPT
adgiuditgain/OPT
admoneschias/OPT
adoptai/OPT
adossassas/OPT
adulads/OPT
adversitad/OT
affectescha/OPTQ
affilieschia/OPT
affixavan/OPT
affruntais/OPT
agitaziuns/OT
agiunschevan/OPT
agravar/OPT
agreablamain/OT
agripools/OT
alchemists/OT
alienà/OPT
allegadas/OPT
alliavan/OPT
allocescha/OPTQ
alloschaments/OT
alterassan/OPT
altista/OT
alventa/OT
amebicid/OT
ameglierassas/OPT
amputass/OPT
anatomisada/OPT
anchusa/OT
anglofila/OT
angulara/OT
anguschian/OPT
annullava/OPTQ
annunziavan/OPT
antichisant/OT
antidatescha/OPTQ
antimilitaristics/OT
anzas/OT
apercepziun/OT
apostatassan/OPT
appaschentada/OPT
appellà/OPT
appreziava/OPTQ
approfundassan/OPT
aquarelleschia/OPT
aras/OPT
ardevas/OPT
argient/OT
argientada/OPT
armonisadas/OPT
armonisescha/OPTQ
armoniseschas/OPT
arriv/OPT
arrogant/OT
ascendida/OPT
ascensiun/OT
assaglis/OPT
assassinesch/OPT
assediassan/OPT
associain/OPT
associeschas/OPT
atoms/OT
atterrais/OPT
attira/OPTQ
attristadas/OPT
aucziuneschan/OPT
australas/OT
autamain/OT
autoexplosiun/OT
autorisain/OPT
autorisass/OPT
avantpista/OT
aventureschias/OPT
avinond/OPT
avischinar/OPT
avria/OPT
ballina/TQ
bandegiond/T
bau/T
bavra/TQ
bingiain/T
blastemma/TQ
boicottassas/T
broschads/T
broschava/TQ
calculabladads/T
caracterisava/TQ
cardinalmain/T
cavitaziun/T
centrifugava/TQ
chantunals/T
chaschunava/TQ
chautschas-trumbetta/T
citeschias/T
clegeva/TQ
cochetteschian/T
collidescha/TQ
commentond/T
condemna/TQ
confect/T
consolidescha/TQ
conspiradas/T
convertess/T
conviva/TQ
crab/T
cribla/TQ
cromatografia/T
cumandava/TQ
cumenzament/T
cundescha/TQ
cundividessan/T
cunviagiain/T
curclescha/TQ
dafna-plimatsch/T
debattegiava/TQ
decleria/T
decumpensescha/TQ
degusteschas/T
delirescha/TQ
denominassan/T
depalatalisescha/TQ
descendenza/T
desertescha/TQ
devastain/T
dezonescha/TQ
dionisicas/T
dischavantagiava/TQ
discordia/T
disdiva/TQ
dissolvan/T
divergescha/TQ
donnegià/T
dretga/TQ
durar/T
eco-bau/OT
educar/OPT
edulinguisticas/OT
elastasas/OT
elavura/OPTQ
electrifitgescha/OPTQ
elegantamain/OT
elevai/OPT
elicitassan/OPT
emancipeschas/OPT
emballà/OPT
embellivas/OPT
embratschassan/OPT
embusti/OPT
emittents/OT
empagliads/OPT
empermetteva/OPTQ
empizzidas/OPT
emplantavan/OPT
emploiesch/OPT
empraschunai/OPT
empurtond/OPT
empustassas/OPT
enchadanais/OPT
enchastradiras/OT
enclavigliass/OPT
encotschniva/OPTQ
encrappass/OPT
encrappavas/OPT
encurunia/OPT
endirì/OPT
endoplasmatic/OT
endrizzassas/OPT
enferrar/OPT
enfierns/OT
enfladeschian/OPT
engiavinadras/OT
engiavunass/OPT
engippescha/OPTQ
engrasseschan/OPT
engraziava/OPTQ
engrossidas/OPT
ennavais/OPT
enologica/OT
enquagliadas/OPT
enraschà/OPT
ensalavas/OPT
ensavunias/OPT
ensemnescha/OPTQ
enstgireschia/OPT
entardavas/OPT
entretschava/OPTQ
enturnedenturn/OT
entusiasmai/OPT
envilgesch/OPT
enzoneschan/OPT
eolicas/OT
epileschas/OPT
equichinetica/OT
erigia/OPTQ
erigissas/OPT
eroisassan/OPT
ertass/OPT
erumpan/OPT
esser/OPT
estetiseschia/OPT
estgas/OT
etic-professiunals/OT
europeisain/OPT
europeisesch/OPT
evocava/OPTQ
evoluziunaras/OT
excerpads/OPT
excessivas/OT
excitassas/OPT
excitava/OPTQ
excommunitgà/OPT
executass/OPT
exequissas/OPT
existissan/OPT
exmatriculeschian/OPT
expirà/OPT
explitgar/OPT
exporteschas/OPT
expressivitad/OT
expulsadas/OPT
extemporescha/OPTQ
extendì/OPT
extinguer/OPT
extirpeschian/OPT
extremas/OT
fanfara/T
fastizava/TQ
fetas/T
finiva/TQ
fissiuneschias/T
focalisai/T
focussescha/TQ
frastga/T
fructifitgava/TQ
fundavas/T
galvanisava/TQ
gasometers/T
giastond/T
giginescha/TQ
glinettas/T
grammaticalisescha/TQ
graveschia/T
guvernantas/T
hachia/OPT
hassegiava/OPTQ
haussiers/OT
hipsters/OT
hypesch/OPT
icing/OT
idografias/OT
idolatria/OT
idratisass/OPT
ignoravas/OPT
imaginads/OPT
imam/OT
immobilisond/OPT
immovibla/OT
impertinenza/OT
imperturbada/OT
impesteschas/OPT
implitgescha/OPTQ
implorais/OPT
imponian/OPT
importuneschian/OPT
impressiunà/OPT
improvisesch/OPT
inactivai/OPT
inaspris/OPT
incass/OPT
incassabel/OT
incendiais/OPT
incommodescha/OPTQ
inconquistabels/OT
incorporais/OPT
incumparabels/OT
indebitadas/OPT
indicatura/OT
inditgeschias/OPT
indoleranzas/OT
indomesticabels/OT
industrialiseschan/OPT
inexplorabla/OT
inflammavan/OPT
inflammeschas/OPT
ingiantai/OPT
ingiuriai/OPT
ingiuriescha/OPTQ
innoveschian/OPT
inoltravan/OPT
inoltraziuns/OT
inscenescha/OPTQ
inscuntrai/OPT
inserissan/OPT
insonorisaziuns/OT
inspirar/OPT
instituziunala/OT
instituziunaliseschas/OPT
instrumentescha/OPTQ
insultass/OPT
insurmuntablamain/OT
insurrecziuns/OT
intensivads/OPT
intenziuneschia/OPT
interceptond/OPT
interesseschias/OPT
internalisassan/OPT
internaziunal/OT
interpretass/OPT
interrumpess/OPT
interrumpeva/OPTQ
intgantond/OPT
intimava/OPTQ
intitulesch/OPT
introniseschas/OPT
intschertadad/OT
inundias/OPT
inventarisar/OPT
inverti/OPT
involuntara/OT
involuntars/OT
ionisads/OPT
ipogins/OT
irradieschias/OPT
irrumpeva/OPTQ
isoladas/OPT
isoleschia/OPT
jades/T
lardellass/T
legiferiva/TQ
lexical/T
locals/T
lugava/TQ
magliuccar/T
maltractaments/T
manidlava/TQ
marinerets/T
masturbescha/TQ
meandravas/T
metal/T
minimalisescha/TQ
minoritads/T
motorisava/TQ
multipol/T
negligiva/TQ
nizzegià/T
nunstizzaivla/T
oasa/OT
observass/OPT
obsidians/OT
obstinescha/OPTQ
octaveschia/OPT
offendessan/OPT
olefins/OT
opiat/OT
opprimids/OPT
organista/OT
originaras/OT
oscillava/OPTQ
ospitalisavas/OPT
ottonianas/OT
parafrasescha/TQ
paraid/T
pativa/TQ
pelletain/T
performescha/TQ
pezzadiras/T
picla/TQ
plascha/TQ
plumbar/T
posava/TQ
predeliberassas/T
pregiava/TQ
presumava/TQ
priura/T
progrediva/TQ
pseudofilosofica/T
pucliava/TQ
quantifitgava/TQ
rablads/T
randomisava/TQ
reaviava/TQ
recalcular/T
recultivescha/TQ
referenziescha/TQ
registrablas/T
reinstallava/TQ
renaturava/TQ
repetiziuns/T
reprima/TQ
restabilescha/TQ
returneschan/T
revalitava/TQ
robotisescha/TQ
rumpaivels/T
sablava/TQ
savurava/TQ
sbariffavan/T
sbuglienta/TQ
schermiglia/TQ
schlargiavan/T
schuschurava/TQ
scua/TQ
scuntrar/T
sdrappava/TQ
sepulescha/TQ
serpegià/T
sflammava/TQ
sglatschava/TQ
sgrifliez/T
sienentescha/TQ
slammescha/TQ
smaladissan/T
snarregiava/TQ
spazza/TQ
spazzastradas/T
splattrogna/TQ
sroma/TQ
stabilisà/T
sterza/TQ
stgirenta/TQ
stgonnian/T
stregliava/TQ
subduciva/TQ
subjectiv/T
suna/TQ
surelevads/T
surexplotava/TQ
surprendeva/TQ
surzinescha/TQ
sutacquisiturs/T
sveglia/TQ
targlina/TQ
tarschina/TQ
terapescha/TQ
testifitgeschan/T
tintinava/TQ
trair/T
trampa/TQ
travatga/TQ
truscal/T
tschareschava/TQ
turbla/TQ
ud/OT
unanimamain/OT
unflias/OPT
ureglietta/OT
urivas/OPT
variassas/T
vegniva/TQ
vitrifitgar/T
zoomava/TQ
è/OPTQ
